Utah statutes.
13-11-22.   Exemptions from application of act.
(1) This act does not apply to:
(a)  an act or practice required or specifically permitted by or under federal
law, or by or under state law;
(b)  a publisher, broadcaster, printer, or other person engaged in the
dissemination of information or the reproduction of printed or pictorial
matter so far as the information or matter has been disseminated or reproduced
on behalf of others without actual knowledge that it violated this act;
(c)  claim for personal injury or death or claim for damage to property other
than the property that is the subject of the consumer transaction;
(d)  credit terms of a transaction otherwise subject to this act; or
(e)  any public utility subject to the regulating jurisdiction of the Public
Service Commission of the state of Utah.
(2)  A person alleged to have violated this act has the burden of showing the
applicability of this section.
